Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1202.01
Tax lists; how prepared.

In preparing the tax list, each county assessor shall enter in a separate column, opposite the name of each person, the person's post office address and the number of the school and road districts in which the taxable tangible personal property of such person is assessable.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 26, p. 393;

R.S.1913, § 6311;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. IV, § 5, p. 552;

C.S.1922, § 5837;

C.S.1929, § 77-405;

R.S.1943, § 77-406;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-406;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 44;

Laws 2008, LB965, § 4.
April 15, 2008